Washington statutes.
RCW 10.99.090

Policy adoption and implementation.

(1) By December 1, 2004, the association shall develop a written model policy on domestic violence committed or allegedly committed by sworn employees of agencies. In developing the policy, the association shall convene a work group consisting of representatives from the following entities and professions:

(a) Statewide organizations representing state and local enforcement officers;

(b) A statewide organization providing training and education for agencies having the primary responsibility of serving victims of domestic violence with emergency shelter and other services; and

(c) Any other organization or profession the association determines to be appropriate.

(2) Members of the work group shall serve without compensation.

(3) The model policy shall provide due process for employees and, at a minimum, meet the following standards:

(a) Provide prehire screening procedures reasonably calculated to disclose whether an applicant for a sworn employee position:

(i) Has committed or, based on credible sources, has been accused of committing an act of domestic violence;

(ii) Is currently being investigated for an allegation of child abuse or neglect or has previously been investigated for founded allegations of child abuse or neglect; or

(iii) Is currently or has previously been subject to any order under RCW 26.44.063, this chapter, former chapter 10.14 RCW or former chapter 26.50 RCW, or to a domestic violence protection order or antiharassment protection order under chapter 7.105 RCW, or any equivalent order issued by another state or tribal court;

(b) Provide for the mandatory, immediate response to acts or allegations of domestic violence committed or allegedly committed by a sworn employee of an agency;

(c) Provide to a sworn employee, upon the request of the sworn employee or when the sworn employee has been alleged to have committed an act of domestic violence, information on programs under RCW 43.20A.735;

(d) Provide for the mandatory, immediate reporting by employees when an employee becomes aware of an allegation of domestic violence committed or allegedly committed by a sworn employee of the agency employing the sworn employee;

(e) Provide procedures to address reporting by an employee who is the victim of domestic violence committed or allegedly committed by a sworn employee of an agency;

(f) Provide for the mandatory, immediate self-reporting by a sworn employee to his or her employing agency when an agency in any jurisdiction has responded to a domestic violence call in which the sworn employee committed or allegedly committed an act of domestic violence;

(g) Provide for the mandatory, immediate self-reporting by a sworn employee to his or her employing agency if the employee is currently being investigated for an allegation of child abuse or neglect or has previously been investigated for founded allegations of child abuse or neglect, or is currently or has previously been subject to any order under RCW 26.44.063, this chapter, former chapter 10.14 RCW or former chapter 26.50 RCW, or to a domestic violence protection order or antiharassment protection order under chapter 7.105 RCW, or any equivalent order issued by another state or tribal court;

(h) Provide for the performance of prompt separate and impartial administrative and criminal investigations of acts or allegations of domestic violence committed or allegedly committed by a sworn employee of an agency;

(i) Provide for appropriate action to be taken during an administrative or criminal investigation of acts or allegations of domestic violence committed or allegedly committed by a sworn employee of an agency. The policy shall provide procedures to address, in a manner consistent with applicable law and the agency's ability to maintain public safety within its jurisdiction, whether to relieve the sworn employee of agency-issued weapons and other agency-issued property and whether to suspend the sworn employee's power of arrest or other police powers pending resolution of any investigation;

(j) Provide for prompt and appropriate discipline or sanctions when, after an agency investigation, it is determined that a sworn employee has committed an act of domestic violence;

(k) Provide that, when there has been an allegation of domestic violence committed or allegedly committed by a sworn employee, the agency immediately make available to the alleged victim the following information:

(i) The agency's written policy on domestic violence committed or allegedly committed by sworn employees;

(ii) Information, including but not limited to contact information, about public and private nonprofit domestic violence advocates and services; and

(iii) Information regarding relevant confidentiality policies related to the victim's information;

(l) Provide procedures for the timely response, consistent with chapters 42.56 and 10.97 RCW, to an alleged victim's inquiries into the status of the administrative investigation and the procedures the agency will follow in an investigation of domestic violence committed or allegedly committed by a sworn employee;

(m) Provide procedures requiring an agency to immediately notify the employing agency of a sworn employee when the notifying agency becomes aware of acts or allegations of domestic violence committed or allegedly committed by the sworn employee within the jurisdiction of the notifying agency; and

(n) Provide procedures for agencies to access and share domestic violence training within their jurisdiction and with other jurisdictions.

(4) By June 1, 2005, every agency shall adopt and implement a written policy on domestic violence committed or allegedly committed by sworn employees of the agency that meet the minimum standards specified in this section. In lieu of developing its own policy, the agency may adopt the model policy developed by the association under this section. In developing its own policy, or before adopting the model policy, the agency shall consult public and private nonprofit domestic violence advocates and any other organizations and professions the agency finds appropriate.

(5)(a) Except as provided in this section, not later than June 30, 2006, every sworn employee of an agency shall be trained by the agency on the agency's policy required under this section.

(b) Sworn employees hired by an agency on or after March 1, 2006, shall, within six months of beginning employment, be trained by the agency on the agency's policy required under this section.

(6)(a) By June 1, 2005, every agency shall provide a copy of its policy developed under this section to the association and shall provide a statement notifying the association of whether the agency has complied with the training required under this section. The copy and statement shall be provided in electronic format unless the agency is unable to do so. The agency shall provide the association with any revisions to the policy upon adoption.

(b) The association shall maintain a copy of each agency's policy and shall provide to the governor and legislature not later than January 1, 2006, a list of those agencies that have not developed and submitted policies and those agencies that have not stated their compliance with the training required under this section.

(c) The association shall, upon request and within its resources, provide technical assistance to agencies in developing their policies.

[ 2021 c 215 s 124; 2005 c 274 s 209; 2004 c 18 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.

Findings—Intent—2004 c 18: See note following RCW 10.99.020.